test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-lex_kolgad_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config: 
  hfst: 
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox: 
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests: 

  Verb - kolgâđ: #
    kolgâđ+V+Inf: kolgâđ
    kolgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: koolgâm
    kolgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: koolgah
    kolgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kalga
    kolgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: kalgeen
    kolgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: kolgâvettee
    kolgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: kolgâv
    kolgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: kolgâp
    kolgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: kolgâvetteđ
    kolgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: kalgeh
    kolgâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: kolgim
    kolgâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: kolgih
    kolgâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: koolgâi
    kolgâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: kolgáim
    kolgâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: kolgáid
    kolgâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: kolgáin
    kolgâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: koolgâim
    kolgâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: koolgâid
    kolgâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: kolgii
    kolgâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: kolgâččim
    kolgâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: kolgâččih
    kolgâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: kolgâččij
    kolgâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: kolgâččáim
    kolgâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: kolgâččáid
    kolgâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: kolgâččáin
    kolgâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: kalgâččijm
    kolgâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: kalgâččijd
    kolgâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: kalgâččii
    kolgâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: kalgeem
    kolgâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: kalgeeh
    kolgâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: koolgâš
    kolgâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: kolgâžeen
    kolgâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: koolgâšvettee
    kolgâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: kolgâžává
    kolgâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: kolgâžep
    kolgâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: koolgâšvetteđ
    kolgâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: kolgâžeh
    kolgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: koolgâ
    kolgâđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: kolgâm
    kolgâđ+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: kolgâččii
    kolgâđ+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: kolgii
    kolgâđ+V+Imprt+ConNeg: koolgâ
    kolgâđ+V+PrfPrc: kolgâm
    kolgâđ+V+Actio+Nom: kolgâm
    kolgâđ+V+Actio+Ess: kolgâmin
    kolgâđ+V+Actio+Loc: kolgâmist
    kolgâđ+V+Actio+Ill: kolgâmân
    kolgâđ+V+Actio+Com: kolgâdijn
    kolgâđ+V+VAbess: kolgâhánnáá
